New York, session 2025-2026, A11673.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Section 4903 of the insurance law is amended by adding a 2 new subsection (j) to read as follows: 3 (j) (1) A utilization review agent shall not issue an adverse determi- 4 nation denying, reducing, or terminating coverage for medically neces- 5 sary skilled rehabilitation services solely because the insured or 6 enrollee has failed to demonstrate measurable improvement in the 7 insured's or enrollee's condition. 8 (2) For purposes of this subsection, medically necessary skilled reha- 9 bilitation services may include physical therapy, occupational therapy, 10 speech-language pathology services, pulmonary rehabilitation, cardiac 11 rehabilitation, and other rehabilitative services performed by a 12 licensed health care professional acting within the scope of their prac- 13 tice. 14 (3) A utilization review agent shall consider whether continued 15 skilled services are reasonably expected to: 16 (i) maintain the insured's or enrollee's current level of function; 17 (ii) prevent or slow deterioration in functional capacity; 18 (iii) reduce pain or other symptoms that impair activities of daily 19 living; 20 (iv) prevent hospitalization, institutionalization, surgery, or other 21 more intensive medical intervention; or 22 (v) permit the safe performance of a maintenance program requiring the 23 specialized clinical judgment or skills of a licensed health care 24 professional. 25 (4) An adverse determination shall not be based solely upon a finding 26 that the insured or enrollee has reached a plateau, has failed to demon- EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD16271-01-6 A. 11673 2 1 strate objective improvement, or has a chronic, progressive, or degener- 2 ative condition. 3 (5) Nothing in this subsection shall be construed to require coverage 4 for services that are not otherwise medically necessary or that do not 5 require the specialized knowledge, clinical judgment, or skills of a 6 licensed health care professional. 7 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately.